Illinois, session 104th, HB1629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Municipal Assistance and Permit Review Reform Act. 6    Section 2. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to improve 7the State's permit review and approval process by making it 8easier for municipalities to deal with State permitting 9requirements. This goal shall be achieved by providing prompt, 10accurate information about existing requirements, increasing 11the transparency and accessibility of permitting processes, 12and establishing a timeline regarding the determination of 13permits for covered projects. 14    Section 3. Definitions. As used in this Act: 15    "Covered project" means any project in Illinois that 16involves the construction of infrastructure or public works by 17a municipality of Illinois and requires authorization or 18environmental review by a State agency.19    "Electronic" has the meaning given to that term in Section 203-100 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.21    "Signature" has the meaning given to that term in Section 223-100 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.   HB1629- 2 -LRB104 09163 RTM 19219 b1    Section 5. State agency requirements.2    (a) By January 1, 2027, each State agency that requires 3authorization or environmental review of municipal 4construction or public works projects shall develop a web 5portal to be posted on the agency's website for the purpose of 6enhancing review and promoting timely issuance of permits 7required and shall make the following information available on 8the web portal:9        (1) Checklists and guidance relating to the completion 10    of permit applications, which may include, but are not 11    limited to, existing instructions for completing the 12    applications and examples of complete applications. As the 13    State agency or its subdivisions develop new checklists 14    and develop guidance, they shall supplement the web portal 15    with those materials.16        (2) Permit application forms or portions of permit 17    applications that can be completed and saved 18    electronically, and submitted to the State agency or its 19    subdivisions by electronic signature.20    (b) If an applicant submits a completed permit application 21to a State agency for a covered project in accordance with all 22applicable State and federal law and there is no final action 23by the State agency, then:24        (1) the application shall be automatically approved 25    after 180 days if notice and opportunity for public   HB1629- 3 -LRB104 09163 RTM 19219 b1    hearing are not required by State or federal law; and2        (2) the application shall be automatically approved 3    after 270 days if notice and opportunity for public 4    hearing are required by State or federal law. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 61, 2026.